Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-215
Certificate of registration; certificate of approval of schools; how and where displayed.

Every holder of a certificate of registration shall display it in a conspicuous place within the work area of the barber shop. The certificate of approval of a barber school and certificate of registration as a registered barber instructor employed by the school shall be conspicuously displayed on the premises of the school.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 12, p. 432;

C.S.1929, § 71-2016;

R.S.1943, § 71-215;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 19, p. 1322;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 19.